Maryland, session 2026, SB0788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless
otherwise apparent from context.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0788*

SENATE BILL 788
(c) “Deed” includes any deed, grant, mortgage, deed of trust, lease, assignment,
and release, pertaining to land or property or any interest therein or appurtenant thereto,
including an interest in rents and profits from rents.
(d) (1) “Deed of trust” means a deed of trust that secures a debt or the
performance of an obligation.
(2) “Deed of trust” does not include a voluntary grant unrelated to security
purposes.
(j) “Mortgage” means any mortgage, including a deed in the nature of mortgage.
3–104.
(f) (1) (i) In this paragraph, “under the attorney’s supervision” includes
review of an instrument by the certifying attorney.
(ii) 1. A deed other than a mortgage, a deed of trust, an
assignment of rents, an assignment of a lease for security purposes, or an assignment or a
release of a mortgage or a deed of trust may not be recorded unless it bears:
[1.] A. The certification of an attorney admitted to the Bar
of this State that the instrument has been prepared by the attorney or under the attorney’s
supervision; or
[2.] B. A certification by a party named in the instrument
that the instrument was prepared by that party.
2. A. A PERSON OR FORM DOCUMENT MAY NOT IN
ANY WAY REPRESENT THAT CERTIFICATION OF PREPARATION OF AN INSTRUMENT
BY AN ATTORNEY OR UNDER THE ATTORNEY’S SUPERVISION IS THE ONLY METHOD
OF CERTIFICATION FOR RECORDATION OF THE INSTRUMENT UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
B. A CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT MAY NOT REFUSE TO
RECORD AN INSTRUMENT UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SOLELY BECAUSE THE
INSTRUMENT DOES NOT BEAR CERTIFICATION OF PREPARATION BY AN ATTORNEY
OR UNDER THE ATTORNEY’S SUPERVISION.
(iii) A mortgage, a deed of trust, an assignment of rents, an
assignment of a lease for security purposes, or an assignment or a release of a mortgage or
a deed of trust prepared by any attorney or one of the parties named in the instrument may
be recorded without the certification required under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.